Washington statutes.
RCW 2.44.020

Appearance without authority—Procedure.

If it be alleged by a party for whom an attorney appears, that he or she does so without authority, the court may, at any stage of the proceedings, relieve the party for whom the attorney has assumed to appear from the consequences of his or her act; it may also summarily, upon motion, compel the attorney to repair the injury to either party consequent upon his or her assumption of authority.

[ 2011 c 336 s 58; Code 1881 s 3281; 1863 p 405 s 7; RRS s 131.]